pl: Materiał pałeczki do trójkąta: Aluminium; Mosiądz; Brąz; Kompozyt; Plastik; Guma; Stal nierdzewna; Stal; Drewno; Inne
de: Material des Triangelschlägels: Aluminium; Messing; Bronze; Verbundstoff; Kunststoff; Gummi; Edelstahl; Stahl; Holz; Sonstige
zh-TW: 三角鐵敲擊棒材質: 鋁; 黃銅; 青銅; 複合材料; 塑膠; 橡膠; 不鏽鋼; 鋼; 木材; 其他
fi: Triangelin lyömäpuikon materiaali: Alumiini; Messinki; Pronssi; Komposiitti; Muovi; Kumi; Ruostumaton teräs; Teräs; Puu; Muu
nb: Materiale i triangelstikker: Aluminium; Messing; Bronse; Kompositt; Plast; Gummi; Rustfritt stål; Stål; Tre; Annet
bg-BG: Материал на палката за триъгълник: Алуминий; Месинг; Бронз; Композит; Пластмаса; Гума; Неръждаема стомана; Стомана; Дърво; Друго
ja: トライアングル打撃具材質: アルミニウム; 真鍮; ブロンズ; コンポジット; プラスチック; ラバー; ステンレススチール; スチール; 木材; その他
sv: Material för triangelklubba: Aluminium; Mässing; Brons; Komposit; Plast; Gummi; Rostfritt stål; Stål; Trä; Övrigt
lt-LT: Trikampio daužiklio medžiaga: Aliuminis; Žalvaris; Bronza; Kompozitas; Plastikas; Guma; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Plienas; Mediena; Kita
zh-CN: 三角形打击材料: 铝制; 黄铜; 青铜; 复合材料; 塑料; 橡胶; 不锈钢; 钢制; 木质; 其他
cs: Materiál paličky na triangl: Hliník; Mosaz; Bronz; Kompozit; Plast; Guma; Nerezová ocel; Ocel; Dřevo; Jiné
pt-BR: Triângulo material da baqueta: Alumínio; Latão; Bronze; Material composto; Plástico; Borracha; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Madeira; Outro
ru: Материал ударника треугольника: Алюминий; Латунь; Бронза; Композит; Пластик; Резина; Нержавеющая сталь; Сталь; Дерево; Другое
it: Materiale del battente per triangolo: Alluminio; Ottone; Bronzo; Materiale composito; Plastica; Gomma; Acciaio inossidabile; Acciaio; Legno; Altro
tr: Üçgen vurucu malzemesi: Alüminyum; Pirinç; Bronz; Kompozit; Plastik; Kauçuk; Paslanmaz çelik; Çelik; Ahşap; Diğer
hr-HR: Materijal trokutastog udarača: Aluminij; Mjed; Bronca; Kompozitni materijal; Plastika; Guma; Nehrđajući čelik; Čelik; Drvo; Ostalo
nl: Triangleslager materiaal: Aluminium; Messing; Brons; Composiet; Plastic; Rubber; Roestvrij staal; Staal; Hout; Overig
sk-SK: Materiál trojuholníkového úderníka: Hliník; Mosadz; Bronz; Kompozit; Plast; Guma; Nerezová oceľ; Oceľ; Drevo; Iné
el: Υλικό μπαγκέτας τριγώνου: Αλουμίνιο; Ορείχαλκος; Μπρούτζος; Σύνθετο υλικό; Πλαστικό; Καουτσούκ; Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι; Χάλυβας; Ξύλο; Άλλο
fr: Matériau de la baguette de triangle: Aluminium; Laiton; Bronze; Composite; Plastique; Caoutchouc; Acier inoxydable; Acier; Bois; Autre
th: วัสดุสำหรับตีรูปสามเหลี่ยม: อะลูมิเนียม; ทองเหลือง; สำริด; คอมโพสิต; พลาสติก; ยาง; สเตนเลสสตีล; เหล็กกล้า; ไม้; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Material palčke za triangel: Aluminij; Medenina; Bron; Kompozit; Plastika; Guma; Nerjavno jeklo; Jeklo; Les; Drugo
ko: 트라이앵글 타격봉 소재: 알루미늄; 황동; 청동; 복합재; 플라스틱; 고무; 스테인리스 스틸; 강철; 목재; 기타
es: Material del percutor triangular: Aluminio; Latón; Bronce; Compuesto; Plástico; Caucho; Acero inoxidable; Acero; Madera; Otro
ro-RO: Materialul percutorului pentru trianglu: Aluminiu; Alamă; Bronz; Compozit; Plastic; Cauciuc; Oțel inoxidabil; Oțel; Lemn; Altele
en: Triangle striker material: Aluminum; Brass; Bronze; Composite; Plastic; Rubber; Stainless steel; Steel; Wood; Other
vi: Vật liệu đánh dấu hình tam giác: Nhôm; Đồng thau; Đồng thanh; Composite; Nhựa; Cao su; Thép không gỉ; Thép; Gỗ; Khác
da: Materiale i triangelanslager: Aluminium; Messing; Bronze; Komposit; Plastik; Gummi; Rustfrit stål; Stål; Træ; Andet
hu: Triangulum ütőhangszer anyaga: Alumínium; Sárgaréz; Bronz; Kompozit; Műanyag; Gumi; Rozsdamentes acél; Acél; Fa; Egyéb
pt-PT: Material da baqueta do triângulo: Alumínio; Latão; Bronze; Compósito; Plástico; Borracha; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Madeira; Outro